Illinois, session 104th, HB4082.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-3-10.1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-10.1 new)7    Sec. 3-3-10.1. Election of determinate sentencing for 8certain indeterminately sentenced persons. 9    (a) The General Assembly acknowledges that the 1978 10transition from indeterminate to determinate sentencing was 11intended to promote fairness and consistency resulting from 12the transition. However, persons serving indeterminate 13sentences with minimum terms of 20 years or more were excluded 14from electing to convert to determinate sentencing under the 151978 law.16    (b) As of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 17104th General Assembly, a limited number of persons remain 18incarcerated under pre-1978 indeterminate sentences, commonly 19referred to as "C-number" inmates, each having served over 40 20consecutive years in the custody of the Illinois Department of 21Corrections.22    (c) Notwithstanding any prior exclusion, any person 23incarcerated under an indeterminate sentence on the effective   HB4082- 2 -LRB104 14422 RLC 27560 b1date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 2whose minimum term was 20 years or more as of February 1, 1978, 3may elect to be resentenced under the 1978 determinate 4sentencing law.5    (d) The election must be made in writing to the Department 6of Corrections, which shall inform all eligible persons within 760 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 8104th General Assembly. The Department shall provide all 9necessary forms and assistance to eligible persons.10    (e) Upon election, the person's indeterminate sentence 11shall be converted to a determinate sentence consistent with 12the 1978 sentencing structure and the offense for which the 13person was convicted. Time served shall be applied 14retroactively, and the person shall be credited with all 15sentence credits and earned time applicable under the law in 16effect since the date of original commitment.17    (f) Any person whose recalculated determinate sentence has 18been fully served shall be immediately released to a mandatory 19supervised release term under the terms applicable to the 20offense class and sentence length at the time of original 21sentencing.22    (g) The Prisoner Review Board shall schedule hearings for 23eligible persons who elect this option within 180 days after 24receiving their request. Thereafter, continued review shall 25occur no less frequently than every 12 months, unless earlier 26action is deemed by the Board to be appropriate.  HB4082- 3 -LRB104 14422 RLC 27560 b1    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 2parole or mandatory supervised release for any person who does 3not elect this option, or who is otherwise ineligible.4    (i) This Section is intended to restore the opportunity 5for resentencing that was available to other similarly 6situated persons in 1978, and to ensure equitable treatment 7for those who were excluded solely based on the length of their 8original minimum sentence. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.